District of Columbia statutes.
16-4426

Jurisdiction.

(a)

A court of the District of Columbia having jurisdiction over the controversy and the parties may enforce an agreement to arbitrate.

(b)

An agreement to arbitrate providing for arbitration in the District of Columbia confers exclusive jurisdiction on the court to enter judgment on an award under this chapter.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4404.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 26 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).